en: deposit refunds
fr: consigne remboursable
hr: povratna naknada
sv: panta, pant

en: single-use deposit
de: Einwegpfand, Einweg-Pfand, Einweg Pfand, DPG-Pfand, DPG Pfand

en: reusable deposit
de: Mehrwegpfand, Mehrweg-Pfand, Mehrweg Pfand

en: recycle as green waste, compost, green waste
fr: compostable, à composter
it: umido, raccolta umido, compost, compostabile
nl: recycle als GFT, gft

en: recycle as food waste
fr: biodéchets, à recycler avec les biodéchets
sv: sorteras som matavfall, matavfall

en: recycle as garden waste
sv: sorteras som trädgårdsavfall, trädgårdsavfall

en: recycle in sorting bin, sorting bin
fr: bac de tri

en: discard, to discard, throw away, to throw away, non-recyclable, to be thrown away, to be discarded
de: wegwerfen, nicht recycelbar, zum Wegwerfen
es: embalaje no reciclable, no reciclable
fr: jeter, à jeter, non-recyclable
hu: eldobható, eldobandó, eldobni, kidobható, kidobni, kidobandó, nem újrahasznosítható, szemét
it: non riciclabile, indifferenziata
nl: restafval, bij restafval, niet PMD
pt: descartar, a descartar, para descartar, não-reciclável, não recicláel
sv: sorteras som restavfall